Utah statutes.
72-4-201.5.   Tenth Mountain Division Memorial Highway.

(1)  There is established the Tenth Mountain Division Memorial Highway composed of the existing Route 224 from Kimball Junction southeasterly to the junction with Route 248 in Park City.

(2)  The department shall designate this portion of Route 224 as the "Tenth Mountain Division Memorial Highway" on all future state highway maps.



Enacted by Chapter 153, 2002 General Session

